South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4383.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Medicaid Protection and Expansion Act". SECTION 2.  Chapter 6, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 10 South Carolina Medicaid Protection and Expansion Act Section 44-6-1210. (A) There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the "Medicaid Stability Fund." (B) The fund shall be used exclusively to offset reductions in federal Medicaid funding that impact the State of South Carolina or its Medicaid-eligible populations. (C) The fund may receive revenue from: (1) state general fund appropriations; (2) budget surpluses; (3) reallocated funds as authorized by the General Assembly; and (4) gifts, grants, and donations from private or public entities. (D) The Department of Health and Human Services shall administer the fund and report annually to the Governor and the General Assembly on fund usage, balance, and future projections. Section 44-6-1220. (A) The Department of Health and Human Services shall take all actions necessary to fully expand Medicaid eligibility as provided for under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, including: (1) expanding eligibility to individuals earning up to one hundred thirty-eight percent of the federal poverty level; and (2) accessing the enhanced federal match rate of ninety percent for new enrollees. (B) The department shall develop an enrollment plan, fiscal impact report, and implementation timeline within ninety days of the effective date of this article. (C) The department shall submit its report and implementation plan to the General Assembly and the Governor within one hundred twenty days of the effective date of this article. Section 44-6-1230. (A) The Department of Health and Human Services shall partner with: (1) licensed hospital systems; (2) federally qualified health centers (FQHCs); (3) public and private universities within the State; and (4) the South Carolina Hospital Association. (B) The partners identified in subsection (A) shall conduct a biannual impact assessment evaluating: (1) coverage gaps in Medicaid-eligible populations; (2) uncompensated care costs; (3) regional health outcomes by county and zip code; (4) the economic impact of Medicaid expenditures and cuts on local economies; and (5) workforce needs for Medicaid service providers. (C) The findings of the biannual impact assessment must be reported to the General Assembly every two years beginning July 1, 2026. SECTION 3.  If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----